Utah statutes.
58-47b-501.   Unlawful conduct.

"Unlawful conduct" includes:

(1)  practicing, engaging in, or attempting to practice or engage in massage therapy without holding a current license as a massage therapist or a massage apprentice under this chapter;

(2)  advertising or representing himself as practicing massage therapy when not licensed to do so; and

(3)  massaging, touching, or applying any instrument or device by a licensee in the course of practicing or engaging in massage therapy to:

(a)  genitals or anus; and

(b)  breasts of a female patron, except when a female patron requests breast massage, as may be further defined by division rule, and signs a written consent form, which must also include the signature of a parent or legal guardian if the patron is a minor, authorizing the procedure and outlining the reason for it before the procedure is performed.

